Nevada, session 83, AB115.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 331 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Administrator, in coordination with the Museum
Director of the Nevada State Museum, may rent or lease rooms in
the Capitol Building for the purpose of holding an event.
2. The Administrator shall charge a fee for the rental or lease
of a room pursuant to subsection 1.
3. Any money the Administrator receives pursuant to
subsection 2:
(a) Must be deposited in the State Treasury and accounted for
separately in the State General Fund;
(b) May be used by the Administrator only for maintenance of
the Capitol Building; and
(c) Does not revert to the State General Fund at the end of
each fiscal year.
4. Any interest or income earned on the money in the
account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the account. Any claims against the account must be paid as
other claims against the State are paid.
5. The Administrator shall adopt regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 331.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
331.010 As used in NRS 331.010 to 331.145, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Administrator” means the Administrator of the Division.
2. “Buildings and Grounds Section” means the Buildings and
Grounds Section of the Division.
3. “Department” means the Department of Administration.
4. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
5. “Division” means the State Public Works Division of the
Department.
Sec. 3. NRS 331.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
331.190 [Any]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any person
who sells, barters, gives, or in any way disposes of any spirituous or
malt liquors, wines or cider, of any description whatever, within the
Capitol Building of this state, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to an event that
is held in the Capitol Building pursuant to section 1 of this act.
H
-
*AB115*